Onglet 1
[Work in Progress. Names to be changed. Title to be changed. Anything here, really, is subject to change if it makes for a better story or if it’s too hard to put into a VN]




Hot cocoa, spoilt with blood


Introduction
[Ambiance : ]
This is the story of how I lost myself.
Love was my guide throughout, but I cannot absolve myself of my own responsibility. It would be too easy to put the blame on fate, or on Amélie.
I wish there was a happy ending to this tale.






_____________



Content Warnings



# [CW]






_____________



Breakfast - Pre flashback
Loving part - early morning, waking up, cosy, romantic


Bedroom
Every morning, I would awake to the smell of hot cocoa that came from the kitchen.
Our room was warm, bathed in sunlight.
There was an empty spot in bed, right to where I lay, still full of Amélie’s shape.
# bedroom bg
# afficher le sprite de la dom vers la droite

Before we met, we both had trouble waking up in the morning.
Every day, I would hit the snooze button on my alarm, only to do it again ten minutes later. I didn’t want to leave the comfort of my bed, the warmth of the sheets, or my half-forgotten dreams.
I didn’t even sleep well after the first alarm : there can be no rest when you know you’re dallying and should already be on your way. At the back of my mind, I always thought about the time I had left before the next alarm.
I would feel exhausted before I had even set a foot on the floor.



After I met Amélie – no, when we woke up together at the sound of a common alarm, hugging each other in the same bed – it became easier. The weight of fatigue didn’t disappear all of a sudden (for love cannot cure one's health), but I had a reason to stay awake.
In those days, I want to believe that I was happy.


Even when our rhythms diverged[a], I kept my drive. Although I would have loved to cuddle with Amélie, to bury myself in her in hopes that we would merge together forever more, I could rise with ease, so appealing was the prospect to join the one I loved and enjoy her cooking.
# Leïla : Soft smile. / Amélie : Neutral expression, perks up when she hears Leïla.
Leïla: Good morning, my love.
Amélie: Ah! You’re awake! Good morning darling!



The moment she heard me, she perked up. Her head darted towards me in a swift motion, and she was all smiles, not unlike a lamb who has just seen her mother and runs towards her, elated to see her again, and nuzzles against her wool.
There was such a stark contrast between how she was when she focused on brewing hot cocoa for us – lost, relaxed, distant, or perhaps dreaming, stirring the pot without a thought for it ; her movements were automatic – and her attitude when she saw me.
She hasn’t lost that joy. Today still, she loves me and loves being with me.


# Amélie : Happy / Leïla : Soft smile, eyes closed. A heart happens at every mwah.
Amélie: I’m almost done! I’ll join you in the living room soon, go take your meds.
Leïla: Nope.
I moved in to embrace her, to kiss her head over and over. Mwah, mwah, mwah.
# Amélie wink and :3 / Leïla : grins, eyes closed
Amélie: Eheheh, what are you doing?~ 
Leïla: I’ll stop kissing when you stop being this cute.
Amélie: Oh no! But I’m adorable!
Leïla: Yes. You are.
Mwah.
She kept giggling.
I think her enthusiasm is the reason I fell for her. I certainly felt like I loved her more and more, day after day, as I kissed her, loved her, and she kissed me in return, assuring me all the while that she felt ever so lucky to be with me. She expressed such undiluted pleasure, joy and affection that I never doubted that she truly loved me.


We stayed like this, muttering sweet nothings and thinking of the day to come for a while. The chocolate had melted in the pan, and Amélie kept stirring to ensure it would mix well with the milk. I lost myself within the whirl, enjoying every smell: the warmth of the chocolate, the faintest dash of vanilla. Milk too; but that was an aroma less pleasant, and it soon faded away to become cocoa.
Amélie’s smell, too. Easily my favourite.
# Amélie, smiles less / Leïla, sighs, opens eyes.
Amélie: Oh, just so you know, we don’t have much chocolate left.
Leïla: Drat. I’m adding that to our grocery list. Looks like we’re missing vanilla too.
Amélie: Yup! And we’ll have to go to the store, cause it’s not like there is anything vanilla about me! 
# [Wink animation, star appearing next to her and falling on her face, followed by a strained smile]
Amélie: Ha ha. Sorry.
Leïla: I liked your joke, don’t apologise.


We poured the cocoa in our mugs and went to the living room. Amélie took no time in drinking her own: it was as though she didn’t care for the boiling heat of the beverage, and, sometimes, she would have finished her mug before I took my first sip.
There was something astounding in her haste, and I would wonder time and time again if she could taste anything through the heat.
As for the pain, Amélie had proved time and time again her ability to withstand it: be as it may, I had long since accepted that she and I had nothing in common on that front, and that something that would make me cry in agony, she would welcome quite happily.
Why, most of the time, she even moaned.
There was still some time left before the laundry cycle would be done, and more time still before I would have to leave for work,[b] so we settled on the sofa and started watching some videos on YouTube together. That day, it was something about bunkers and how they work; more of an analysis of the use of the theme in science-fiction and some experiments than a practical dive into their engineering.
# The happy music fades somewhat.
Various[c] musings on how life must feel for those trapped in a shelter, with no hope of ever seeing the outside world; to be stuck with the same people all your life, to breathe the same recycled air, and to spend your time repairing the same systems that keep you alive; becoming so attached to the society people once had during better times that you do everything in your power to keep it in place, with no room for growth.
It felt melancholy.
# Happy music resumes
Still, I was happy. I was next to the one I loved and we were watching a video together. {u} My mug was warm, and the cocoa was sweet on my tongue; it had been mixed unevenly, and big chunks of chocolate were stuck at the bottom, almost overpowering in their taste compared to the milk I had drunk before.
It was full of love, and the best I had ever had.

A cosy life. Love expressed in a stable, domestic form.
# Leïla: mouth slightly opened, concern? / Amélie looks alarmed
Leïla: Oh, right, my meds. I almost forgot.
Amélie: Shoot ! My gel ! I knew I was forgetting something.
She stood in a hurry while I grabbed the medication from the top drawer of my desk. It didn’t take long before I could hear her wince and curse.
# Amélie has left the screen, or is transparent ; expression >-<
Amélie: Why must they put alcohol in this thing? Don’t they know this stuff hurts?


First Discomfort - uncanny, unassured; Amélie is still very happy and sweet, so that needs to be there. Leïla ignores how uneasy she feels
I kept looking at the screen without saying a word, trying to ignore the knot that threatened to grow in my stomach. Mechanically, I took my meds. The warmth that spread through my mouth and throat made me notice that I had swallowed them by drinking my hot cocoa.
# Amélie: >_< D:
Amélie: I swear… at least this will disinfect the wounds. Again. I guess I should also put on some cream but my arms are already covered in gel. Uuurgh…
# Amélie reappears, exaggerated >:(
Amélie: And I can’t even hug you when I’m like this! I swear, this is transphobic!
# Soft smile for Leïla
Leïla: I really don’t think E gel is transphobic.
Amélie: Not hugging you certainly is transphobic!
Leïla: I guess it is, yeah.
Despite it, she nuzzled my shoulder with her head, and that sign of affection was enough to douse the worry at the back of my mind, and we were once more a loving pair. Amélie chided me for not having waited for her, and she rewound the video back. It was clear that she no longer thought about the wounds on her arm, for she didn’t make any comment, and neither did she marvel at “how pretty they were”.
My own reasons pushed me to ignore them and to not look at the cuts and bruises glistening beneath the gel. I much preferred to leave all those marks behind, lock them behind the bedroom door and pay them no heed once we were done. In a way, her nonchalant attitude helped me achieve that.


Time went by. Early morning eventually came to a pass. I couldn’t postpone preparing for work or I would risk being late, and so we paused the video. I took our mugs to the dishwasher. The laundry machine had completed its cycle.
I could have let Amélie handle that; {u} dress myself, kiss her goodbye and leave for the funeral home.{u} Yet, I felt too anxious. I needed to know that everything was okay.[d]

# Amélie: ^w^         / Leïla has stopped smiling, anxious.
Leïla: Can you please get the rack?
Amélie: Yes Miss!
Leïla: Thank you, love.


Inside was a bundle of white sheets. I distinctly remember how they felt: they were heavy with cold water, and so different from our usual laundry, so fresh and warm. Still, I took them out. 
I diligently inspected them, looking for any speck of dried blood.
To my relief, the cold wash had worked: there was no ugly brown to be found amidst the white.
# Leïla closes her eyes, exhales.
There had been so much blood yesterday. More than I had ever seen spilt in my life.
I had truly thought that my sheets would never recover from the scene; that they would forever remind me of the way I had – but they were clean, and I had to hang them to dry, so I went to the living room where Amélie had deployed the clothes rack. She sat at the desk, surfing or playing on the computer, this I did not see fully.
Although I wished for her to be more proactive with the chores, I let her be. When she so desired, Amélie could be the most diligent maid I could have asked for. The rest of the time, she tarried, and she let herself be caught into the computer’s web.
Had I given her the order, she would have happily hung the sheets: Amélie did everything I asked.[e] This, perhaps, is precisely the reason why I did it all by myself without saying a word: I feared fostering this tendency of hers.
I have never wanted her to see me as her Mistress foremost.
Can’t a girl want her girlfriend to help around the house out of duty and love rather than out of lust?


The task was easily done, although I had to use some chairs as an improvised rack to avoid putting everything on top of each other. It was time to leave, and I began dressing myself. By the time I was done, Amélie was still on the computer.
Leïla: It is time for me to go to work, love[f].
# Exclamation
Amélie: Oh[g], wait!
She quickly sat up from her chair and took off her pajamas in front of me, leaving them on her desk.
She was beautiful.
In this moment, I desired nothing more than to grab her and push her against the wall, to put my hand on her chest, on her butt, on her hips and grope every part of her being: to let her know how much I loved her, how much I lusted for her; to hear her moan my name, thank me for the attention, thank me for using her. I would make her mine. She loved when I told her she was mine.
But then, she turned around to show me her back, and everything about this fantasy collapsed…
Full dissociation. Leïla can’t ignore what she has done. She doesn’t want to show how unwell she is, but she panics.
# Amélie Expression séduction Polly
Amélie: Can you tell me how it looks[h]?
…when I saw my name carved into the skin on her back.
Every letter red with blood.
Cuts uneven, rough. All angles, and no curves. Like a child writing uppercase out of a bundle of sticks.
Amélie: Is it still legible?
A mess of fine lines and opened wounds, where the skin had been cut open and gaped.
I could not look away.
I had done this to her.


Leïla: Y-yeah. I. Hold on, I’ll take a picture for you.
She clapped and posed – she behaved exactly like she was trying out a new dress at the store, like she wanted to see how it fitted her, if I thought it made her look pretty. Like she wasn’t aware that I had carved scars on her back.


# :D
Amélie: Lemme see!
Amélie: Oh! It’s gorgeous! Thank you thank you thank you! Hahaha! Yes!
But there she was, right next to me, looking at the picture on my phone, hugging me in a fit of elation.
She truly thought these wounds made her look pretty.
She was euphoric, and oh so grateful.
Amélie: I’m so glad! Normally they fade away after a night. I heal just way too easily. But this time, you really did it! I don’t think you ever cut that deep!
Amélie: Oh, I love you Leïla!


She kissed me, again and again, with an energy she normally didn’t have. And her voice - it was so full of joy, of excitement, of - of worship. To her, I was a Goddess.
I didn’t want her to see how I felt. I couldn’t ruin her joy, spoil it with my worries. I was afraid she would feel guilt and be ashamed of herself.
I didn’t want to break my promise.
# Amélie is surprised / pained
So I… I hugged her close to me. My arm brushed against her back, right against the scar. She made a small cry, right between pain and surprise. I sensed her tense against me for an instant, and then she laughed.
# Amélie is happy
Amélie: I should probably put on a bandage, and disinfect it again. A shame.
Leïla: Yeah. That’s a good idea.
How could she not hear the emptiness in my voice? The distance?
Probably because I made it impossible for her to.
I helped her with the wound. Carefully disinfecting it again, just like I did last night. Again, she winced. Again, she laughed. Something about her nerves, about that type of pain.
# Amélie winks
Amélie: Thanks, babe.
Leïla: Amélie?
# Questioning
Amélie: Yeah?
Leïla: I love you too.
# :3
Amélie: I know! Eheheh.
She started turning around to embrace me, but I needed her to be still. I wasn’t done treating the wounds, and I didn’t want to let her wait any longer before I bandaged them. Not like yesterday night. So I kissed her on the nape of her neck, and I went back to my task.
By the time we were done, I was running late.[i]
She didn’t want to leave me, and she whined when we had to go our separate ways.
I didn’t want her to leave me either.
I really, really wished I could stay in her arms. Even though she had just cuddled with me with an affection, a glee I had never quite seen in her… I still felt as though I needed a hug.




Flashback : meeting
Flashback : Bar ambiance
I fell in love with Amélie at the first sight of her.
[New] We met at a queer bar. She was working behind the counter, she wore a harness over her shirt: her countenance was sensual, sophisticated, and she moved with ease as she prepared cocktail after cocktail.
I had come there to be part of a discussion group for queer women: I meant to meet people and find friends, to talk about love, relationships and sex in a place where I’d be safe. I had arrived too early, but the bar upstairs was already full of people who stood around, laughed, and talked together.
I hadn’t been in Paris for long, at the time. It was one of my first nights outside, and I wasn’t yet used to this type of setting : the pink lights, the music, the alcohol, the people almost overwhelmed me, so much so that I considered going home for the night; I stood near the bar, uncertain of what I should do.
She noticed me and called out.


Amélie: Hey! Are you okay? Can I get you anything?
Leïla: Oh! Sorry, I got lost. And no, thank you, I don’t drink.
Amélie: As you wish! But do know we have softs too, and I can whip you up something.
Leïla: Thank you.
# Wink, sourire séduction
Amélie: I don’t think I ever saw you here before, and I’m pretty sure I would remember someone even half as cute- 
She held her tongue, feeling as though she had crossed a line and caught herself too late. As for myself, I felt flattered, if a bit embarrassed.
# Yeux ouverts, sourire doux
Amélie: Sorry, sorry, I could not resist. But, seriously, tell me if I’m being too much. We’re a nice place, and I want you to have a good time.
Leïla: It’s fine. I’m just here for the meeting. Can I have something sweet?
Amélie: Sure!


We talked for a bit, about our tastes, the various softs she could make, and then about the event. I explained that I was from Provence, that I had come to this city for work, and that I was eager to meet friends in the local queer scene.
Amélie listened well. Occasionally, she had to prepare someone’s order, but she made sure to come back to me afterward and resume our conversation.
Her smile, her attention felt earnest. Soothing. She answered my questions about the group downstairs, she reassured me that everything would be fine, that I could trust the organiser and that she would be there for me if I needed any help.
When time came to go downstairs, I was at ease, if a little saddened to leave.
# Sourire un peu doux, léger, yeux ouverts, wink pour le second?
Amélie: Don’t hesitate to come back.
Amélie: You seem really sweet and, if you’d like, I’d love to be your friend.


Meeting again afterward, romantic, other setting
We met again afterwards, first at her bar, later at an association, and then as friends. I got the opportunity to better know her. To see how cheerful and outgoing she was, even when she wasn’t behind a counter.
She always had a pun at the tip of her tongue.
She was so pretty, too.
# ^^ :3
And her boldness! She always said what was on her mind, no matter who could hear her, no matter the subject: it was a sight to behold, that time she nerded out on the minutiae of vore and cannibalism in the middle of a fast food restaurant, without any concern for the increasingly agitated looks of that couple on the table over. Oh, one of our friends was beyond mortified, and when they later messaged Amélie to tell her about it, I thought that she would never stop apologising. It was as though she hadn’t really thought that the topic was anything to be ashamed of or keep behind closed doors.
It didn’t take long for me to realise that I had fallen for her.


Kinks arrive
Setting: at home. Shy, intimate? 
So when she asked me out, when I agreed and we came to be together, her sudden shyness came as a surprise. I could notice that a shadow loomed over her head whenever there came the topic of intimacy; the girl who kept talking about sex toys, past partners and unusual kinks had become so demure that she would never ask for us to have sex. While she had often rested her head on my shoulder or hugged me without a thought when we were friends, she looked for my consent to hold my hand with a concerned look on her face. Sometimes, she unconsciously groped my chest, and this made me smile, but still she apologised when she noticed what she had just done.
Yes. I could tell that she was not fully herself when we lay together in the same bed. When we kissed and cuddled, naked, and I humped her body, feeling so lucky to be with her, her thoughts were far, far away.
It worried me.
# Chambre, Amélie regarde de côté, :(, blush throughout
I loved her. I didn’t want sex to be a burden to her, and I apologised - I thought I had gone too far and too fast. I told her that I had presumed that she really loved sex because she kept calling herself a “slut”, and that I could wait, or not have any sex altogether, that she was more important than any lust - but this made her quiver and shake her head.
“Please, no. No. I, I like sex. I just. I don’t want you to hate me.”
I assured her that I could never hate her. Still, Amélie could not bring herself to tell me what worried her: she blushed and refused to look me in the eyes. I told her I could wait until she was ready to talk, and that I would always be there, ready to listen… but it was obvious that it had weighed on her. She wanted to tell me.
But she felt too ashamed.
I tentatively took some guesses to relieve her: had something happened to her? A previous partner? (No - well, not really) Was she afraid to ruin our relationship? (A nod) If she feared I would hate her… was it that she did not find me desirable?
# Yeux chat, sourcils non!, bouche exclamation
“No! No, that’s not it at all!”
# Si possible, sprite avec yeux dans les mains
By that time, she had buried her face in her hands, facing away from me. She looked ready to run away, and so I ceased my questioning, embarrassed, curious, sad and a little vexed that she would not tell me.
Eventually, she sat up. I thought she would leave, and I could not understand what I had done wrong - but instead, she went to fetch a slip of paper, and she wrote something on it.


SFX : Paper. Insert photo of the letter I wrote for that scene.
Sorry.
It’s hard for me to talk about that. I really love you and I’m scared I will scare you away if I tell you what I want. What I need.
I have really hard kinks. Violent ones. I’m scared you’ll think I’m crazy, that you’ll tell me it’s insane.
I’m scared of your pity.
I want to be hurt. *Really* hurt. To be used like a toy, a victim, a prey. To be mocked when I cry, when I ask for mercy, and to be hit even more.
You love me. You want to cherish me.
And that’s why I fear you will refuse to do that - you’re so gentle. So kind.
You deserve better than me.
I don’t want you to hate me.


# Askance, :(, sourcils non, sourire triste
She handed it to me. The whole time that I read, she nervously drummed her fingers together, always fidgeting, so certain that I would flee.
I felt so touched, being allowed to see her in such a vulnerable light, so ready to break. I was honoured that she chose to trust me in spite of the fear that clearly held her. So I assured her of my love, and of my understanding: that I would not try to “fix her”, that I did not think that she was weird, that I did not think she was hateful for wanting to be hurt. I had long suspected that she was into BDSM - the choker, the constant puns, her attitude were such a giveaway - and I loved her for who she was.
# Yeux chats, :(, sourcils non
If she wanted me to hurt her, if that’s what it took for her to enjoy sex, then I was ready to give this to her.
I promised her I would never judge her, that I would never make her feel ashamed of her desires, and that I wanted to know more so I could satisfy her.
I will always remember how she leaped to hug me, so ready to cry, so full of relief.
I held her tight, vowing I would never let go.


We talked about her kinks that night. I still have the list she made.


Intimacy restored / Primarily centered on Amélie’s desires, her excitement to share her desires. Leïla listens, she wants to satisfy Amélie. Romantic tones.
Afterwards, the shadows were lifted. There was an ease to Amélie’s voice and to her movements: what had only been puns about wanting to be stepped on and various remarks that she always retracted when I pressed her had now become open fantasies. She hugged me, sank her hands into my body, delighted that she could touch me, delighted I would touch her in return.
Faced with a bottle of alcohol, she asked me if I wanted to make her drink until she could not stand, so I could have my way with her, not considering that I didn’t want to have any alcohol (maybe she thought that it was okay if she was the one drinking?).
When a friend smoked, she later told me that she longed to be used like an ashtray, to have cigarettes ground into her - that she swooned when she thought of the pain this would bring her, all for so small a convenience! The appeal was in the sheer unbalance.
Choking, kidnapping, rape play, face slaps, being locked in a closet, being kept as a doll or as a pet, being spat on, having a gun held against her head and being eaten alive - she delved into all these topics and so many more with such earnestness, always explaining why she liked them like I would not understand and judge her for them - or like she was relieved to finally have someone understand and love that part of her, that part that she would flaunt to friends and strangers, and hide to her partners.
Throughout our conversations, I listened. I never looked away, I never expressed the pity or the disgust that she feared I would feel when I would know who she truly was.
I endeavoured to treat her with respect. I did not interrupt her, I answered truthfully when she asked me what I thought and if I would agree to do this to her. That time our friend smoked, seeing how excited she was at the prospect of becoming an ashtray, I paused and gave it an honest thought; I was not a smoker. Still, I asked her if she knew where the nearest tobacco store was, and she crossed her arms with surprise[j][k].
# Cross arms if possible. Sourcil cocked, exclamation, yeux ouverts
Amélie: What? No! Smoking is bad for your health, and cigarettes are too expensive. It’s just a fantasy, I don’t want you to do that to me.
She held me closer than before afterwards.
# Sourire :3 ou avec dents, sourcils normaux, yeux… contents, blush
I was happy to see her beam.
I could see how much it mattered to her to be accepted for who she was.


Introspection: Leïla’s past relationships
Ambiance: introspection, thinking about the past… loneliness, dysphoria.
Amélie was right when she said I was gentle and soft. I care for my partners. I love them, I want them to feel cherished. This has led me to fulfilling the roles they expect of me: most often, this meant I was a top.


I am quite tall, and, as a result, many girls have told me that they wanted me to step on them. Between this, the expectations people have of a trans woman and the tendency of many transgender girls to be subby bottoms, it was the norm for me to lead in bed. To be active, to take.
I never really questioned this: it felt so natural to have that role. When I said that I did what my partners wanted of me, I did not mean that they actually told me that this was what they desired or expected: it was simply the course of things. I had always been a top, and I had never really thought of being anything else.
I had grown up surrounded by such assumptions, after all: back when people assumed I was a boy, I was often praised for my height or my broad shoulders. I was told I would probably grow up to be a ladykiller. And girls did notice me. I was asked out several times, or pushed into relationships - I could never really understand why. But I followed what was expected of me… and I played the boyfriend’s part. I learnt how to act.
I remember being told that I slouched too much, back when I was a teenager. In retrospect, I think that I was trying to make myself look small. Dysphoria ensured I grew up looking at the ground.
I felt too masculine. I didn’t act masculine enough.


People didn’t expect me to transition.
I was not that tall for a boy, but I have had many remarks about it now that I am seen as a woman. To me, it is a point of dysphoria.
So, it came as a surprise when lesbians praised me for my height, even before I came to Paris. I distinctly remember that time, at the meet-up, where I had told that I was looking to make friends and someone joked that it would not take long for me to break some hearts with how tall I was.
For some reason, it did not feel good at all.
It felt… othering. Like I was receiving the same kind of compliments that I had received before. Like what was loved were precisely the parts of me that made me feel less of a woman.
I grew to accept them more. Still. I never quite felt seen. It is not like lesbian love can help me forget the way passersby look at me when I walk in the street.
Ambiance: going back on track, talking about the relationship. Leïla tries her best, but can’t fully satisfy Amélie.
I apologise that this tangent was so long a departure from my original tale. What I simply meant was that my previous relationships had imprinted on me certain habits: I was expected to be the top. This was my role.
I was gentle and soft, I wanted to satisfy the ones I loved, and this is precisely why I accepted to become a Mistress to Amélie, or to at least try.
I could not understand why she wanted me to punch her when I wanted to treasure her, and wanted her to treasure me.
I could not understand why she wanted me to insult her, even though I loved her, even though all she deserved was praise.
But I had made a promise. It did not matter that I could not understand, that I would have hated for anyone to act towards me in such a way: I trusted her, and I vowed to make her happy, no matter what it meant.


My very first attempts were clumsy - my blows were soft, my insults amounted to little more than “you ne’er-do-well”, and I gravitated towards scenes that allowed me to shower her with love and praise - but they were earnest. With time, I learnt.


Obviously, I couldn’t fulfill all of her fantasies, and I do not only mean those pertaining to tobacco or alcohol: certain ones, such as the cannibalism or the rape, were far too heavy for me. As for the cannibalism, she understood and agreed that she would much rather stay alive, and that she would certainly safeword out of pain if I bit her until the flesh gave. As for the rape, she received the news with disappointment - but I made sure to explain that I loved her, that I did not judge her, and that it was simply too much.
# Amélie apparaît sur fond noir introspectif. Yeux chats, :|, sourcils non!
“I would probably safeword for that too anyway.”
It was plain that she was trying to make me feel better and downplay her desires.
It made me feel like a part of me had broken to see her so dejected.
Thinking about the knife session that panicked her, how she came to that place. Short passage… 
As time went on, I could not bear to disappoint her again: many of the limits I had then, I have long since crossed; so it went with the scars Amélie bore on her back, on that morning I first recalled. I never wanted to inflict any permanent damage, to not leave marks that would not heal, because the very idea frightened me -
and yet, after several months, I found myself pinning her upon our common bed with all of my weight as to ensure she would not move while I carved my name with the tip of my knife. Chiding Amélie whenever she cried, whenever the pain made her body twitch in such a way that she risked ruining my handiwork.




How did I come to this place?
It took a long time for my principles and my fears to get eroded.


Now comes the part that I’ve delayed for so long.


Flashback resumes: Things were going well at first, Leïla loved BDSM
Enthusiasm, lust, desire for power and pain.
I loved doing BDSM with Amélie.
I want to pretend that she’s the one responsible for the state of our current relationship - that she’s the one who destroyed all our love and replaced it with that play where I must play the Mistress and she the slave - but I can’t. Amélie merely opened the door.
Playing together brought me a rush of pure, undiluted power. The knowledge that I only had to speak, and Amélie would do everything in her power to content me.
She cleaned our place with a look of such concern, with such haste.
Sometimes, I would have her kneel by my side, naked, and I made her wait for my commands.
She desired nothing more than to obey, to finally be given a chance to please me, and I loved nothing more than to toy with that impatience of hers.
Dialogue
Leïla: Wait, darling.
Leïla: Let me enjoy this moment. You will have your time when I’m done.
# Sourcils suppliante, exclamation, yeux ouverts
Amélie: B-but, please, don’t you want-
Leïla: Hush.
Leïla: You will do as I say.
Leïla: You don’t have a choice.
Leïla: After all - I own you, don’t I?~
# Overjoyed, :D
Amélie: Y-yes, Mistress~
Amélie: You own me, I’m yours, only yours~
Narration
Once she had simmered enough, she was so desperate that it was hard not to laugh: I had merely made her kneel naked for a few minutes and she had already cast aside all of her dignity.
Had I allowed her to move, she would have licked my leg and kissed my feet. She would have prostrated herself to the ground and promised me anything, all so she could stop waiting and finally start to obey.
She never quite appreciated the humour of it. She was already obeying me: my one and only order was to stay still and wait for further instructions. But there, she’d say…
Dialogue
# Pout, sourcils froncés, yeux chats
Amélie (pouting): “This doesn’t count, this is torture!” 
Leïla: Don’t you love me when I torture you?
Amélie: Yes, but-
Leïla: Then it’s settled. Five more minutes will do you good.
# Suppliante, exclamation
Amélie: Please, Mistress!
Leïla: In silence, if you will.
Narration
How vexed she was when I could not take it and laughed! The look of sheer offense on her face, that I dared toy with her, that I had my fun at her expense!
How she squirmed, too. She loved being my toy, she loved it when I humiliated her. She knew I knew, and that made her all the more ashamed.
Do not worry, Amélie. I always let you serve afterward. It would certainly have been amusing to call you, to ask of you to stand in a corner for a few minutes and then send you on your way just to show you I could, but I never did. I felt like such a show of power would have been far too mean-spirited.
You have always said that you loved nothing more than that. Power for the sake of power. Unjust and unfair acts that you cannot retaliate against, acts that showed how much you were mine.
But then, you did change your tune when you had to go through, when the fantasy wasn’t yours.


And hitting her! Hitting her brought the biggest smile to my face. How I loved to hear her cry, to hear her voice rise so high. Blow after blow, she moaned, she pleaded for mercy, she thanked me for using her like this.
It was such fun to play with her like this, to see how many blows she could take and to see her react to the way I hurt her: how her body tensed, the tone of her voice, her efforts to try and protect herself.
With time, I learnt how far I could go on a given day. I learnt that, if she was a brat and needed to be reminded of her place, it was best to keep hitting the same place with a cane. I learnt to read the signs that she might break if I pushed any further, the signs that I could let myself loose.
Yes. Hitting Amélie made me feel like the queen of the world: after all, it was such a high! She could do nothing but moan and beg, and I, I was all-powerful, I held her in the palm of my hand.


It’s not about pain.
Well. It’s not entirely about pain. It’s more about power, or about trust[l].
When I hurt Amélie, I saw a side of her that was only mine. I saw the way she reacted to pain, to fear, yes, but I also saw her… so full of joy.
Leïla: You’re doing so well, doll. Breathe. Just ten more. Count for me.
#Blindfold, :D, sourcils suppliante ou non
Amélie: A-aah… Y-yes, Mistress… Please… Please…
Praising her through the ordeal made her beam with pride. She was doing her best for me, and I felt… honoured. Honoured that she would let me do this to her, that she trusted me enough to be so vulnerable, to let me make the decisions in her stead so she could enjoy the ride.

When we cuddled afterwards, her relief was like a drug. She always drifted away, spent by her experience in subspace. So I was her anchor: I held her in my arms. I kissed her head. I made sure that she drank water, ate some chocolate, and I let her rest.
Planning these scenes allowed me to show Amélie how much I cared for her. To show that I knew her desires, better than anyone else, and that I was ready to fulfill them.
It was enough to know she was happy. To know she was thankful.
It was enough for me to know that I could be proud of myself.


The high fades. It’s not enough. Cracks in relationship. Difficulty to talk about it.
Unfortunately… it wasn’t enough.


Amélie: Mistress?
Leïla: Yeah?
She looked away, blushing.
It reminded me too much of that talk we had had about her kinks.
We weren’t in a scene. I was simply reading on the couch when she came to me, having exited the shower.
Amélie: The bruises have already faded. Do you think you could hit me harder next time?
This was a common complaint of hers.
Leïla: Babe… I don’t think I can? You couldn’t have taken another blow. I swear, one more and you would have cried and we would have had to stop there.
Amélie: Well… you could just tie me up so I can’t move and force me to take it?
I sighed.
It was so tiring.[m]
During our scenes, Amélie was grateful. She was loving. I could tell that by the way she looked at me, the way she breathed: she was entirely living in the moment, and she adored it.
But the moment we were done - the moment that scene was in the past - that joy was gone, and there came the regrets.


“You could have gone further”
“I can take it”
“I wish my body would bruise more easily”
“I wish it bore your mark”
I never could understand it.
Dialogue - angrier
Leïla: You were begging for mercy, you kept telling me it was too much, that you would do anything if I stopped.
Amélie: Yeah, but I didn’t safeword! It’s just… to help me get in the right mindspace. It helps me deal with the pain, and it’s a nice scene.
Leïla: To make it seem like you hate it and want me to stop, yeah.
Amélie: It’s just roleplay! I don’t hate it! Don’t you trust me?
I just sighed. I really didn’t want to have that conversation.
She never even thought that she wasn’t the one trusting me - trusting that I knew how far she could go before she broke down and had to be held back together, trusting that I knew where I wanted to stop.
She never considered how hitting her when she begged me to stop made me feel.
It would have been fine if only she were grateful for all I did.
# Askance, grimace, sourcils froncés
Amélie (annoyed): You know what? Forget it.
I watched her leave the room.
It hurt when I felt how relieved that made me feel.


Introspective. Regret, anger, frustration, sadness.
It wasn’t the first time Amélie and I had had a fight.
Much as I loved her enthusiasm during scenes, I hated that it never was enough.
Amélie lived in the moment, and that meant that once we were done, she still longed for something more.
The whiplash felt too much, at times. To have the one I loved so grateful in the moment, only to complain later and tell me I hadn’t done well enough… it made me want to give up BDSM entirely[n][o].
What’s worse is that, whenever we had had a fight, Amélie would distance herself from me. She told me that she needed her space, but, in the meantime, I was left by myself. I craved reassurance, I wanted nothing more than for her to tell me that she was sorry, that she loved me, that we could work through this together - but I only got silence out of her.
Silence - and, afterward, guilt[p].
Amélie was not an idiot. She could see how hurt her behaviour made me feel. But her guilt led her, similarly to me, to avoid the situation entirely: several times, I saw her ready to grab my chest, only to stop mid-air, like she was catching herself in the middle of doing something wrong.
Tension fades away. Leïla calms down. She looks at this from afar, recognises their faults, wishes for what could have been.
No matter her intentions, the result was that I was denied intimacy, and that she constantly felt sorry for being a bad girlfriend ; and since it hurt to see her beating herself so, I inevitably reassured her.
No, Amélie. You weren’t a monster for this. You simply… had wants and needs. You were enthusiastic about our scenes and you loved them, but you wanted something more. You were frustrated.
You didn’t consider my feelings, or my own limits, but I know that you didn’t mean to hurt me.
I wish you would have reacted better to the situation.
I wish we had known enough to communicate better then. Maybe, if we had been more honest, less afraid to hurt each other, less ready to keep quiet out of fear that the other would break up with us… maybe then, we wouldn’t be where we now are.
Maybe we could have been happy.


Happy memories
Of course, this tale of mine skips many events of our daily life.
By focusing on our relationship to BDSM, by focusing on some key moments that now stand out to me, I am glossing over acts of love and intimacy: the joy of cooking together. Our dates. Flowers gifted. Discussions in the night. Games played together, movies watched together. Laughter, shared jokes, hopes and dreams for the future.
Such is the way memory and regret work.
There was always some reason to hold onto our relationship, to hope something could be fixed. Amélie and I made some efforts, we did talk, we made some resolutions - but they weren’t enough.
Amélie promised that she could be happy without me hurting her - and she truly thought so at the time. Never mind that I liked our scenes, that I only disliked her behaviour afterward; it felt like a good solution at the time.


No time to be together: distance. Loneliness.
Unfortunately for us, Amélie eventually settled back in a behaviour marred with fear, distrust. She was more distant, and more angry with herself.
If we had had more occasions to spend time together, we might have been able to work this through. Unfortunately for our relationship, our schedules never quite aligned: a barmaid and a mortician do not exactly share the same working hours.
When we had first become girlfriends, we did not have such a problem. I had come to Paris in hope to find employment, for the village where I lived, back in Provence (Cavaillon, if you ask), did not provide me with many opportunities to work as an embalmer. It was also an opportunity for me to meet other queer people, to make friends, to reinvent my life in a place where no one knew who I had been.
The point is, when Amélie and I had met, I had not yet found a stable job. By the time we got together, I occasionally worked as an independent contractor and my hours were highly irregular. Yet, this arrangement meant that we could spend time together during the afternoon, provided I had no other engagement.


At this point in time, back when the first cracks in our relationship had shown, I had, at last, found a salaried position with consistent hours and consistent pay, at a big corporation. But that position came with a more strict schedule that mainly took place between 10am and 5pm.
Amélie, meanwhile, worked from 6pm to 2am. She was asleep when I left for work, and I was asleep when she came back from hers.
While I spent my time caring for the people that were entrusted to me, cleaning their corpses, giving them the treatments that had been requested, doing my best to give them some dignity in death… Amélie slept. 

At first, I tried to make do with that. I would go to the bar after work to meet with Amélie, greet her and eat dinner during her break. And while she was happy to see me, it proved a poor arrangement: she was at work, after all. She couldn’t give me much attention.
I was left alone, in a place full of noise and people and alcohol, and, frankly, this was too much when I just wanted to rest.
I stopped going to the bar, and explained to Amélie that I would do my best to eventually get assigned to a night shift.
I wonder how much her actions have been influenced by loneliness. When she felt so dissatisfied with the results of a scene, when she asked for marks that would last for more than a day… had she dreamt of me while she was at work? Of what we would do together when we finally had time during our days off? Was it about having a reminder?
I do not know for sure. I was too lost in my own solitude.
It hurt me to only hear her complaining, asking for more, getting so defensive when I tried to tell her that I was doing my best, that I had done all I could to make her happy, and that I only wanted some gratitude.


What made the situation worse still is that Amélie was the first person in Paris with whom I really felt connected and that, rather than make friends of my own, I became a part of her friend group.
I had plenty to do with finding my bearings, along with a job. 
And as our relationship sank, I felt less and less comfortable with the idea of talking to them, certain that I was that they would take her side over mine if I were to complain.
I couldn’t shake the idea that, to them, I was “Amélie’s girlfriend” or “Amélie’s Mistress” - not Leïla.


And so… I spent most of my days in a funeral home, alone with corpses, or at our own home, alone again.
During that period, our relationship amounted to little more than waiting for our days off, twice a week. The rest of the time, we spent by ourselves, making sure to stay quiet so we wouldn’t wake up the other while she slept.
At first, you leave cute notes on the table, or hearts drawn onto a post-it on the door; you exchange messages on Discord and voice messages to talk about your day, you arrange dates as best as you can, and that’s what allows you to go through the separation.

One such way of dealing with the distance, in our case, was brewing enough hot cocoa for us both and placing it in a thermos.
We didn’t want to break our ritual: it felt too cruel otherwise, like admitting that things couldn’t work anymore.
Ever since we had gotten together, we had always brewed cocoa when we woke up, no matter the time of the day. Depending on my work hours, I could sometimes stay at home when Amélie woke up, and I would bring her a cup in bed.

Only, this time, I wasn’t there when she woke up, and neither was she.
All that awaited us was a lone thermos in the kitchen, and cocoa getting cold. 

Other problems piled up after a while.
It’s like being in a long-distance relationship, only you end up finding dirty plates or hair in the drain instead of love notes: even though you never have time to see each other, you still live in the same place and you have to share chores - and by share, I mean that you really do them on your own. 
You clean up after the one you love while they sleep in your bed, and your resentment grows. By the time you’re done, you’re spent. You take shortcuts. You never notice all the mess you’ve made, all the chores that you left for when you’d come back from work. Your partner is the one who dealt with those.
But you don’t forget their mistakes; and so the cycle goes, until frustration is all that remains.
It was a nightmare.
In the end, we even stopped bothering with the hot cocoa.
Dates were our only way out.
So often, we tried to make up for all the time lost through BDSM, all those days and all those nights when we slept next to each other and were unable to touch.


This is why it hurt so much when Amélie kept complaining.




[INSERER UNE SCENE OU ON MONTRE LA TENSION PENDANT LE SEXE SI J’AI LE TEMPS - probablement y mettre l’idée de chloé sur pas la peine de faire du sexe vers la fin]






We dealt differently with the pain.
I retreated into myself.
Amélie threw herself more into work.


#Background: Bar. Music: Muffled bar.
Unbeknownst to me, Amélie had made a plan.
After one too many fights, she had reached the same conclusion I did in my exhaustion: she wanted to stop doing BDSM with me.
She had figured that, if the topic always made us fight, if it had stopped bringing us joy, she could make up for it elsewhere. And so, she took on some more responsibilities at the bar: she helped organise kink events, parties, workshops.
She also got more invested in her associative work.
She had been part of a transgender group for a while, mostly to meet with friends; now, she was starting new projects, discussion groups on specific topics, and helped with various organising demonstrations, not realising the weight of all this new responsibility.

I suspect Amélie flirted a lot, during that period. Looking to fill in some gap, enjoying the attention - and also behaving like she always had before we met, without thinking of what it meant.


The fight
# Background: Living room
It took me some time to notice it.
It was one of our days off, I was waiting for Amélie to wake up. I think I meant to invite her to a picnic, because it was sunny outside and I hadn’t yet had my lunch.
She was happy when she woke up, and since it had been a while since we had both been in a good mood, we cuddled on the couch and talked.
# Sprite during the last paragraph: really close to one another. Looking in the same direction.
# Dialogue start: throughout, Amélie and Leïla’s names are dull. They look tired.
Amélie: Hey, sweetie.
Leïla: Hey love.
Leïla: How are you today?
Amélie: Pretty well. Everything went exactly as planned yesterday night, and that’s a relief.
Leïla: What was it again?
# Bouche exclamation, yeux fermés, sourcils normaux
Amélie: A shibari workshop downstairs. I’m so glad people came, I spent way too much time advertising it.

# Amélie closes her eyes in the sprite.
Leïla: Huh. That’s new.
Amélie: Yeaah…
Leïla: …
She was relaxing further into my arms.
Leïla: …would you like to… Maybe go to a workshop like that one day?
Leïla: It’s been a while since I tied you up.
Amélie: No, thanks.
# Sprite: Leïla is surprised. / Amélie was exclamation, eyes closed
Leïla: Really?
# Sourire large, ouvre les yeux à la fin.
Amélie: Yeah, I’m good.
Amélie: You don’t have to do that anymore if you don’t want to.
Amélie: I love you regardless.
# Sprite : Leïla is a bit angry
Leïla: What the fuck does *that* mean?
# Cocks eyebrow
Amélie: …I mean… you know?
Leïla: What? No?
Her weight against me was growing uncomfortable.
# Amélie’s sprite is tired : yeux chats, sourcils non, :| j’imagine
Amélie: …let’s not pretend you like indulging me. I know         you’d rather have a normal girlfriend. I know you’re tired of us fighting all the time. Could we please just have a nice day together?
Leïla: What are you talking about?
Amélie: Babe…
# Sprites separate. 
Leïla: What is this about?
# Askance. exclamation
Amélie: I don’t want to fight. I just think it’d be… good to stop with everything. It’s not worth it.
# Sprite of Leïla gets angrier
Leïla: Don’t just decide that on your own!
Leïla: I’m your Mistress! Why are you- I’m not indulging you!
Amélie: …yeah, you’re not.
Leïla: What does this mean?
Amélie: I know you don’t want to hurt me. I know you hate my kinks.
Leïla: This is- You’re wrong!
Amélie: Am I? Really?
Amélie: It’s not a problem. I love you, Leïla. And I think I’ve let my kink destroy too much of our relationship, and I just want us to stop before it’s too late.
Leïla: Would you fucking listen to me?!
# Pause of several seconds with no text. Music stops.
# Amélie looks away
# Leïla’s sprite: tired and sad
Amélie: …
Leïla: …Why are you acting like this?
Leïla: You’re… just deciding things on your own, without… talking to me about them.
Leïla: Does my opinion not matter?

# Amélie’s sprite looks back to Leïla.
Amélie: No, not at all!
Amélie: I mean, yes it does! I thought this would make you happy!
Leïla: Why would this make me happy?
Leïla: …how could this make me happy?
# Amélie finally looks exhausted

Amélie: …
Amélie: Every time we have sex… I feel like it’s only because I’m making you.
Amélie: You’ve been avoiding the topic lately. I… try to talk about what we did, I want to talk about what else we could do… and I see you tense up.
Amélie: Like it’s just a chore for you.
Amélie: Maintenance for me.
Leïla: …I like having sex with you, Amélie.
Leïla: I like it when I hold you in my arms. I like it when you’re in my lap and I spank you.
Leïla: When you try to escape, when you moan and cry, but I hold you firmly in place.
Leïla: I love telling you that you belong to me. I love praising you, and I love your expressions when I insult you; when you nod so frantically and beg for more.
Amélie: …Really?
Leïla: Yes, Amélie.
Leïla: …I just…
Leïla: I just wish you would stop complaining all the time.
Leïla: I hate it when you make me feel like I’m not doing enough. When you act like I’m not trying my best to make you happy.
Leïla: …I just wish we had more time for ourselves.
Amélie: …yeah.

# [Silence]


Amélie: …No news about the night shift?
Leïla: …we don’t hear much about them. It’s hard to know if anyone plans to quit. My manager says there’s no opening yet.
Leïla: I guess I could always try looking for a job at PFG, but I don’t think I want to be blacklisted by Eclerc… I won’t have too many choices afterward if…

# Leïla sighs
Leïla: …I can’t wait to open my own funeral home…


# [Silence]


Amélie: …What do we do?
Leïla: …I don’t know.
Leïla: I’m tired. I’m hungry.
Amélie: …You really don’t think I’m a burden?
Amélie: You don’t hate me?
Leïla: I don’t. I swear I don’t.
Leïla: I love you.
Amélie: I love you too.
Amélie: I’m sorry.
Leïla: …things are going to be alright.




Depression - Using BDSM as a crutch.
Awkward period
#nvl
We tried to patch things up, afterwards. The tension in the air hadn’t entirely dissipated, but it weighed less.
Amélie eventually told me about the events she organised at her bar. I could hear the weariness in her voice: there was none of the excitement she usually displayed when she broached the topic. Furthermore, she often stopped talking in the middle of a sentence.
# Transparent sprite of Amélie, exhausted, in the middle. Play/Bar outfit.
# Background: inspired by Cris et Chuchotements
# Night club music?
I had seen her behave this way before, when we went to play parties: once they were over, back when it was time to go home and rest, her attitude changed. She would grow exhausted and stop emoting altogether, speaking slowly in a monocorde voice, wholly unlike how she talked but five minutes ago.
# The sprite is euphoric
Throughout the party, she had danced and flirted, made pun after pun, had run from place to place with such excitement; she had spoken to strangers like they were old friends of hers, and she had played again and again, laughing the whole time.
She felt so happy.
Receiving blows, being tied up, serving, basking in the ambiance… she felt at home.
# Sprite tired
But once the party was over… she was spent, and none of her energy remained.


Despite our talk, we didn’t end up having any sex on that day off, nor on the morrow. We cuddled and we watched a movie, Grave. We cleaned, we cooked, and we played some video games.
Before we knew it, it was time to go back to work.


This week was especially hard. I kept waiting for Amélie to answer my messages on Discord, and I know she kept waiting for my own answers. Furthermore, what little we exchanged over text wasn’t nearly enough to address all our feelings.
We might very well have fared better had we exchanged by email.
I felt torn between my love for Amélie and the frustration that had accumulated. My feelings kept nabbing at me, whether I was tending to a corpse or resting at home - the only time when I wasn’t thinking about our relationship must have been when I met the bereaved. Focusing on their grief gave me enough of a reason to forget about my own woes.
I desperately wanted to make things work, and I could not see any way forward. Even the prospect of getting to work during the night shift, to finally have more time together, did not feel like it would solve any problem; only wreck havoc on my body, only make it impossible to make friends with anyone or attend any social event.
Had nothing happened, I would probably have broken up with Amélie.


Evening: Amélie comes home, stops working.
# Living room. Leïla on a side of the screen, work clothes. Amélie appears, crying sprite, and goes through the screen before disappearing.
One evening, however, I was surprised to see Amélie come home at 8pm. She hadn’t sent me any message. Her eyes were red, and her face was marked with tears.
Without a word, she went to our room and rolled in a ball on top of our bed.
# Bedroom : Dark. Amélie’s sprite, facing away from where she looks, still crying.
She hadn’t turned on the light, and so she was lying in the darkness.
# Leïla enters and comes near her sprite.
I approached her softly and held her hand in mine.
She held me tight, unable to speak, but clearly not willing to let me go.
Leïla: Did anything happen, sweetie?
She nodded.
Leïla: Do you want to talk about it?
She shook her head.


I caressed her hair, and her body seemed to relax; she started breathing more evenly, and I noticed that, until then, she had been mostly holding her breath.
We stayed here for a while, lying in the dark.
Even though she was obviously upset, it felt good to be able to hold her against me like that.


# Some time passes. Amélie speaks in a low voice, smaller font than usual. Her name has a very dull colour.
Amélie: …I… broke down at work.
I let her talk, brushing her hair in silence.
Amélie: …there was a problem with a performance. The gal I had talked with couldn’t come, and we had to improvise something last minute, and… apparently it was a bad idea to do some fireplay, even on the stage… and Mar wouldn’t get off my case, because she swears she knows the girl and that she’s an abuser… and I couldn’t take it in the end. Broke a glass in my hand. Went home. Don’t know if… I’ll be able to come back…
I’m just so tired…


# Introspection
Despite her fears, she still had a job to come back to, and I couldn’t tell whether she was relieved or not.
We still had some days until our time off, and I did not have much of an occasion to be with Amélie until then.

However, the incident pushed me to investigate and look through the chatlogs of the Discords I knew she frequented. It’s on the “Transfeminine Support Group” that I noticed that Amélie had been in a number of fights with people who I knew were her friends over the last weeks.
Her tone was consistently sarcastic. She complained that people talked in the wrong channel, never bothered to give sources for pictures, couldn’t look for information that had already been pinned, and she answered very defensively to any criticism.
It felt so… strange to see how badly some of those situations grew.
Incidents so banal and unimportant ended up needing the attention of moderators to put the channel in time-out.
The last one was especially bizarre: a discussion on the representation of trans women in drag, harmful depictions in popular media, reappropriation, pride, between a girl who came from Poland and someone I had seen at the bar, with others occasionally chiming in.
Hours after the conversation was over, right before she had gone to work, Amélie had written a long message which supported neither party and really looked like she was out for a fight.
It was truly baffling.
She had never even cared about drag.


For the first time in what must have been weeks, I decided to go meet her at the bar. Having looked through public chats to research Amélie’s messages, I could not shake the impression that I was behaving like a stalker would, and this made me feel quite uneasy.
And so, I texted her. I told her I was done with work and that I wanted to see her for a bit, go have dinner together. 
Still, I didn’t have enough confidence to write “Hey, I saw that you kept getting into fights and got muted after ranting about drag (???) in #général, is everything okay?”. It was all too obvious that she would make a mountain out of that, and I dreaded the idea of another fight.
# Bar. Amélie’s sprite is transparent because Leïla hasn’t yet interacted with her. Smile sprite variation with lines on the side of the mouth.
Amélie’s lips were too tight around her smile. Anyone who knew her could see that it was forced.
She was talking to a customer when I entered and hadn’t yet noticed me. The noise muffled the words she spoke, but her tone was clear enough: 
it was cheerful to the point of being euphoric, and so full of cracks.


I stood in the entrance, unsure what to do. I only really came further inside when someone came back from a smoke and needed me to move to enter.
Amélie was *wrong*, and seeing her like this made my heart ache and my stomach crawl.
I sat on the barstool.

Leïla: Hey sweetie.
Amélie turned sharply towards me. For the moment that it took her to realise that I was me, she started going through a prepared speech…
Amélie: Hello and welcome to our Cabaret, how may -
# her smile fades. She looks tired.
…which she dropped all of a sudden when she noticed it was not necessary.
Amélie: …Hi babe. Sorry. I’m tired.
Leïla: Is there something I can do?
Amélie: I… I don’t know. Do you want a drink? It’s on me.
Leïla: Give me a hot chocolate.
Amélie: …Haha. I wish I could, but that’s not on the menu.
Leïla: Just some lemonade, please.
Amélie: Coming up.
# Small pause
Leïla: …when is your break? We can go get some ramen nearby.
Amélie: …must be in an hour. Something like… eight and a half…
Leïla: …Amélie, that’s fifteen minutes away.
Amélie: …Is it? Man…
# Amélie sighs
Amélie: …yeah, please. Yeah. Let’s do that.


I took my lemonade and went to a table nearby to wait, until it was time for dinner.

# Outside in Paris
The whole time we walked outside, Amélie was clinging to my arm.
She was so close that, in spite of all the traffic noise, in spite of how low she murmured, I still heard her:

Amélie: …I think I should quit this job.


Amélie stays at home
# Black background.
In the end, I managed to convince Amélie to go to the doctor, so she would get prescribed time for sick leave.
It took some coaxing, and the patient voice I normally used during aftercare: maternal, slow, tender, reassuring. “You are okay now, and everything will be fine. I love you.”
The idea that she might have cut her ties with her friends and lost her source of income terrified me to the point that I accompanied her back to the bar and stayed there the whole time, right up until 2 am. 
Amélie walked very slowly on the road back to the bar, but, apart from that, the night ended without any further incident.
I was so exhausted by the time we got home that I slept through my alarm in the morning and was late for work.


The doctor diagnosed Amélie with burn-out and depression, and so she went on sick leave. I hoped two months would be enough for her to heal.


The atmosphere at home felt tense.
Even though we shared the same waking hours for the first time in months, we couldn’t behave as though Amélie was on vacation: {u} the whole situation felt wrong. She was sick, unwell, and ready to burn everything.
Work was as demanding as always. {u} When I was not embalming corpses with formaldehyde, I hid the marks of death and age that my patients bore, and their wounds as well.
Meanwhile, Amélie stayed home.
On the first day, I found her still lying in bed when I came back from work. {u} She was playing a video game.
# Amélie’s sprite : eyes sunk. Pajama.
# Leïla’s sprite : neutral expression. Outside attire.
Amélie: You’re back already? What time is it?
Leïla: Hi love. It’s half past six. Sorry, I didn’t have time to make you any cocoa this morning.
Amélie: …half past six? Really? How?
Leïla: …is everything okay?
Amélie: …
Amélie: I’ve been playing for hours.
Amélie: …I probably should go and eat or drink something.
Leïla: I’ll bring a glass of water, and we have some lasagnas left in the fridge.
Amélie: …Thanks babe.


This continued on for some days:{u} I would wake up before Amélie, and I would come home to find her hollow, depressed.{u} Hungry, those times when there was nothing in the fridge that was already prepared. {u} The place, too, was a mess: she hadn’t done her share of the chores, and I did not quite know how to address that.
She seemed so… frail, and I felt powerless.
Amélie was unable to explain to me why she behaved this way, and broaching the subject easily made her clam up[q] with frustration and shame{u} - because she hated the feeling of being sick, deficient, of knowing there was something wrong with her that she had no control over.{u} 
As a result, it was sometimes hard to talk with her.

And yet… she was so hungry for affection.
She kept asking me to stay by her side, to cuddle with her and brush her hair{u}, and, when I did, she thanked me over and over.{u} She said that I was kind not to abandon her, and she kept apologising, panicking at the idea that I might.
It broke my heart.


It felt strange to receive so much love from Amélie, to spend so much time with her, and to know that it was precisely because she was feeling so unwell.{u} It tinged any joy I could have felt from those days with guilt, and it made me fear that this wasn’t real.
And yet… my arms clung to Amélie with such strength. I didn’t want to let her go. {u} I was happy that she had come back to me, and I dreamt that, after all this time, things would finally be okay.
I could fix our relationship, and I would nurse Amélie back to health.


At first, I behaved like a mother hen: I woke Amélie every morning with a cup of cocoa, and I made sure that she had something to eat during the day.{u} I showered her with love and care, with kisses and caresses aplenty:{u} I reassured her that everything was okay, that she could rest, forget about work, forget about all her troubles and that I would take care of the chores.

Sadly, this didn’t help Amélie feel better.
The more I cared for her, the more she seemed to retreat unto herself. She hungered for love, but she clung to me in silence.
It took some coaxing for her to tell me what bothered her.

# Bedroom, the two of them really close, Amélie in pajamas, Leïla in work outfit. She smiles.
Leïla: Everything is okay sweetie. I love you. You’re safe here.
Leïla: I can tell that there’s something you want to tell me.
Leïla: You always look away from me and bite your lip when you’re like that.
Leïla: Whatever it is, I’ll be there for you. I love you, and I want us to spend the rest of our life together.
Leïla: I won’t judge you.
Amélie: …
When I saw that Amélie tried to bring herself to talk, I brushed her hair in silence, waiting for her to be ready.
Amélie: …I feel like a waste.
Amélie: I should be at work. I should be able to cook for myself, to clean at home.
Amélie: …you’re doing everything here, and I spend my time playing Vampire Survivors or some other game.
Amélie: … you should hate me for this.
I hugged her tighter.
Leïla: You’re ill. It’s not your fault, and it’s just temporary. You would do the same for me if you were in my place.
Amélie: It’s just… I…
Amélie: I don’t want to stay in bed. I don’t want to waste away. But I try and leave and do something and I’m overwhelmed by fear and that sense that I’m going to break and I want to throw up and cry and -
Leïla: Please, take a breath.
Leïla: 1, 2, 3…{u} Exhale.{u} 1, 2, 3…{u} Inhale.
Leïla: I’m with you.
Amélie: …I want to be useful. Not to give you more work.
Amélie: …but…
Amélie: …I can’t, and this makes me feel worthless.
Leïla: I’ve never thought-
Amélie: Leïla, please - I’m not saying that you think I’m worthless.
Amélie: I think that I am.
Amélie: There’s something broken in me.
Amélie: …do you think I want to stay in bed? That I haven’t showered in days because that’s what I want?
Amélie: …I hate being like this so much it makes me want -
Leïla: …Amélie, stop.
Amélie: …
# Sprite of Leïla : eyes closed.
Leïla: …please, Amélie, go take a shower for me.
Amélie: …Uh?
# Sprite Leïla : eyes opened
Leïla: It would make me very proud of you if you got out of bed and took a shower, or a bath if you prefer, and I know that it would make you feel better as well.
Leïla: It’s okay if you can’t - but… can you at least try?
Leïla: Please?
Amélie: …Yes, Miss.
Amélie: Thank you… Leïla.


Receiving an order overrode Amélie’s mental block.
Once she had showered, she was finally able to smile; and although her expression was bashful, embarrassed that she had not managed to do it by herself, I could tell that Amélie truly felt better.
She was glad to be clean, and filled with joy knowing that I was proud of her.


Should I have sought another way? Was it wrong of me to use Amélie’s submission as a lever?
I do not know.
Back then, seeing how distraught she was, I saw no better solution. I would have done anything for Amélie to get better, and wanted nothing more than for her to finally be happy.{u} So when she kept slipping back into melancholy and aimlessness, when I noticed that giving her orders was the only thing that worked… I embraced it.
I chose to become her anchor; to become her Mistress.


It is easy, with hindsight, to claim that this is the point at which I erred.
Now that things have become what they are and that I have ruined any other relationship between us other than that of a slave and a Mistress,{u} I look back on those days and I see that, rather than nursing Amélie back to health, I made her grow dependent on my orders.{u} That I did not fix, but merely enabled her.
And yet - I felt happy. I genuinely thought that I was doing a good deed.{u} Amélie kept thanking her Miss after all; she was more loving than I had ever known her to be.
So I quelled my doubts.{u} I shut down the uneasiness that I felt when I noticed that Amélie kept calling me Miss outside of our scenes,{u} and I buried my fear when I thought that I was abusing my power by ordering Amélie to clean our place and cook us meals.
More than anything, I didn’t want her to think that I was acting out of pity.
When she told me that she was genuinely happy, I trusted her.
It felt that, had I voiced my doubts, she would have thought that I was disgusted by her needs. That I was treating her like a victim, and not a grown woman capable of making her own choices. 


What’s more, a full time D/s relationship meant I could finally devote myself to soft scenes{u} once I had satisfied Amélie’s harsher cravings.{u} Her preferences had after all always laid with degradation, pain and fear, and, {u} faced with only so many occasions to play together, she used to turn me down whenever I asked her to be my pet for the night.{u}[r]

It’s not that she disliked the idea of being my puppy or my kitty, far from it in fact!{u} But experience had taught us that, were we to choose the direction of a scene, our tastes seldom aligned.

While I wished to pamper Amélie in kisses, have her perform some tricks and toss her sugar cubes - to behave as though she were my darling pet for whom I held nothing but the deepest love -{u} Amélie’s fantasies turned to more abusive scenarios:{u} she longed to be a mutt; to be kept in check by fear, to be kicked and ridicule, and to be confused between love and fear.
# Still novel mode: appearance of Amélie’s and Leïla’s sprites.
# Amélie : nerding, stars in her eyes. Leïla: concerned.
“Dogs love their master no matter what, don’t they?{u} You could punish me whenever I make too much noise, use a muzzle, maybe an electric collar.{u} And you could maybe insult me, because dogs can’t understand, and laugh at how stupid I must be to crawl back to your side, hungry for love.”
“But you’re so adorable when you’re on all four - how could I possibly want to hurt you? Seeing you like that just makes me want to kiss you and love you and give you so much praise.”
# Amélie: wistful
“...It’s just a scene, Leï. Besides… what’s fun is that the dog’s mistress loves it too. She just expresses it poorly. She’s happy to have it by her side.”


Amélie’s urges never disappeared, but she now felt satisfied enough (or perhaps secure enough in her submission) to allow me to cherish her from time to time, or to spank her without having to pretend that I had no regard for her desires and well-being.


Still.
One might wonder how this whole situation led to that time I carved my name into Amélie’s back, or to the events that followed hereafter.{u} It is hard to see a natural cause linking it all: wasn’t I merely helping my girlfriend with depression?
I think that I could not let go of Amélie’s love.
Amélie, my sweet Amélie - it had been so long since she had confided in me, or had that look of adoration in her eyes.{u} It had been so long since I had last felt loved or alive.
I let myself get drunk with the knowledge that I was the reason why Amélie functioned,{u} that it was thanks to me that she could leave her bed in the morning:{u} I was healing her, and that made me a Goddess in her eyes.
Amélie loved me, she existed for me. When she talked to me, the pitch of her voice betrayed the feelings of a schoolgirl having her first crush:{u} it was high, nervous with the laughter of someone who cannot believe their luck and hopes that this is not a dream.

It is much harder to say no to someone who is so full of gratitude and love: to see them cast down their eyes and apologise, and act with a deception so sincere, yet so lacking with resentment{u} - it was so unlike Amélie’s previous behaviour;
So unlike her passive aggression, those accusations that I did not accept her desires, and the insinuation that I was not good enough of a domme.{u} It had only ever felt like a hostage negotiation{u} - and far from convincing me, it had only fostered resentment.


But this Amélie loved me without any condition, and this is the reason why I could not refuse her, which brings us to the fateful night where I carved my name deep into Amélie’s back.
Knifeplay had been one of her biggest fantasies for a while: when I first became her Mistress, even a plastic knife made her breathing grow erratic, made her freeze with fascination;{u} she could not look away from the toy, and she shivered in fear when I brought it close to her throat.
During the scene, it was enough.
Afterwards, she regretted that I had not taken it further, and asked if we could use a real knife.{u} That was before she stayed at home.{u} Back then, I had accepted with a mixture of worry, fatigue and resentment, and the following scene had brought her a lot of joy - that is, before she felt unsatisfied, and asked me to cut into her flesh.
I had always refused.


This time, however… 
We were together in bed, holding each other in an embrace. My arm had grown numb, and her head was resting on top of my shoulder;{u} I basked in the moment, eyes closed, ready to go asleep.{u} At some point, I must have blinked; I found myself looking at Amélie’s face, lost in her beauty.{u} She was so close that her eyes seemed as though they had merged together.
Likewise, she was looking at me. From the corner of my eye, I could see the smile on her face.
Leïla: Hi love.
Amélie: Hi you.
[pause]
Leïla: What are you thinking about?
Amélie: How pretty you are.{u} How lucky I am to have you.{u} How much I love you.
My heart fluttered. I could not help but blush.

Leïla: I love you so much, Amélie
Amélie: …Mistress?
Leïla: Yes?
Amélie: …I was thinking…
Amélie: …Could we please do some knife play later tonight?
She was hanging onto my word, just like a child pleading to buy a video game.
Leïla: …Yeah, let’s do that. It’s going to be fun.
Leïla: I could tie you up, and trace the edge all over your body. You would have to try not to move.
Amélie: And, uh…
Leïla: Yes?
Amélie: Could it… please be sharp, this time?
Amélie: I know you’ve told me no before, but… I’d really like for you to carve your name into my back.
Amélie: I want to belong to you. I want something to remind me that I’m your property and that you’re my Mistress;{u} something that will not fade with time, something that I can carry with me forever, just like a collar or, well,
a wedding ring.
I paused.
Leïla: …Sweetie, you know it’s dangerous.
Leïla: I can carve my name… but I would rather have the edge be dull. I… don’t want to hurt you, or do anything that’s permanent.
Amélie: …I know, but..
Leïla: Would it work if I did it more often, anytime you want? That way, my name would stay with you.

Amélie: …It’s not the same. It will go away.
Amélie: I want it to stay forever.
Leïla: …What if you regret it later?
Amélie: …Please, Mistress. You know I can make my own decisions. Don’t you trust me?
Leïla: I do, but… Amélie, it’s permanent!
Amélie: I want *us* to be permanent[s]!


She was holding me so tight.
To my surprise, I realised that, for all my fears and all my doubts, I could not imagine telling her no.
Leïla: …
Leïla: Okay.
Leïla: I’ll do as you wish.
Amélie: Oh thank you thank you thank you!{u} Thank you so much Mistress!{u} I love you!
Back to present - Knife scene
We decided to have our scene on morrow's evening.{u} I needed time to prepare, and we had to attend to previous engagements.
While Amélie kept giggling and kicking her feet, I anticipated that moment with dread.{u} The perspective of using a knife to cut into my beloved left me unable to think clearly:{u} whenever I tried to examine that feeling of fear, everything froze.{u} I would look into the distance, feel a knot in my throat, and… just stay there for a while. Blinking.


The excuse I found was that I merely had stage fright:{u} I knew how much the scene mattered to Amélie, and I was afraid of coming short of her expectations, of messing up my name when I would write it using the knife.


Looking back, I agree that I was right:
The scene mattered to Amélie, and I was terrified to disappoint her.{u} She was so happy. She had wanted me to use a real knife for months, and I was finally granting her wish.


I know that I should have told Amélie the truth, that I was afraid and that I didn’t think I could do this - that I didn’t WANT to do this! -{u} but I could not bring myself to say that.{u} Whenever I tried, I remembered the fights we used to have: how betrayed she looked, how she kept repeating that I could trust her, that she needed this…{u} and it made me so afraid.


We were finally happy.{u} Amélie told me every day that she loved me.{u} I was fixing her, helping her get back on her feet, and she was grateful for it.{u} *She* was happy, *she* wanted this - I just had to play my role.
It was just a scene.
 




The evening arrived.
When I came back from work and I opened the door, Amélie was there, waiting for me, kneeling naked on the floor.{u} This flustered me, and I entered as fast as I could out of fear that the neighbours might see her if they came for the elevator.
I kissed her on the forehead, petted her hair, and brought her to the living room so we could cuddle on the sofa.


Everything after that, right up until the scene, is a blur.{u} I cannot remember our dinner.{u} I must have talked about my day{u} (I think that I had embalmed a child, but… would I even have told her that?){u} (it made her feel so sad){u} (it was an accident){u} and we eventually went to the bedroom.


It was pristine.{u} Amélie had cleaned everything.{u} The bed was made, the floor had been vacuumed, mopped even.{u} No dirty laundry tossed aside, no mess of books left on the nightstand in a tower that threatened to crumble.
Our plushies had been turned so they would look away from the bed. On top of it, the toys had been carefully arranged. There was a knife among them.
Some candles had even been lit.
She really wanted the moment to be perfect.


# Moment purposefully written as to be long, put as much as possible on one screen, if possible, find a way to make it scroll in one full screen if it’s not too unreadable.


I knew what I had to do.{u} It was not the first time that Amélie had begged for us to have a scene with knives{u} (only the first where the knife was not plastic{u} or dull).{u} She wanted to feel afraid.{u} Owned.{u} I was supposed to tie her up.{u} Maybe, this time, I could be loving when I would carve my name?{u} She had presented the scene like a proposal, and proposals are romantic, right?{u} But there was no point if it didn’t feel real.{u} I couldn’t simply be a devoted girlfriend who had agreed to play a fantasy to satisfy her girlfriend.{u} No, that would not do, that never did!{u} It ruined the immersion. I knew it ruined the immersion.{u} So be stern.{u} Be serious.{u} Toy with her,{u} mock her if she begs or if she thanks you;{u} she wants to feel like a victim too stupid to know that she shouldn’t love her abuser.{u} Make her wait.{u} Anticipate when it’s going to happen.{u} You’ve been standing there for so long already, just bring her to the bed.{u}


You can do this. I could do this.


Once she’s on the bed,{u} (she’s smiling, she’s happy, she wants this,{u} why can’t I want this?){u} we have time to kiss.{u} Forget about the future.{u} Live in the moment.{u}


I have always loved the warmth of her mouth.{u} The feel of her tongue against mine, the way she moans when I suck on it and set the tempo.{u} I have always loved holding her tight in my arms, feeling that we might melt together and become one.


It’s time to be dominant.{u} She’s looking at me, and her smile betrays confusion - when will I start?{u} I have to start.{u}
The cuffs are on top of the bed, to the side.{u} “Now, now, it’s time to make you understand that you are mine.”{u} “Y-yes Mistress! Please Mistress!”{u} “So eager… you sound so pathetic, doll.”{u}
Pause.{u} Let her wait.{u}
“It really makes me want to see you break.”{u} She shivers - my voice must have been sufficiently cruel.{u}


Take her wrist.{u} Grab it forcefully.{u} Make her know that she cannot resist, that you won’t allow it:{u} if she resists, you will put her in her place.{u} Grab harder, twist her arm until it hurts and she calms down.{u} But she let me, and I didn’t have to do that.{u} I realised that I could not tie her on her back if I were to carve it later.{u} I didn’t want to have to deal with unlocking the cuffs later just to turn her around.{u} Improvise.{u} I could have told her.{u} No.{u} If she wants to be a victim, you need to turn her around yourself.{u} Pull her towards you.{u} Look into her eyes.{u} Grin.{u} Be dangerous.{u} There, you can move her body:{u} pin her to the bed.{u} Use your weight.{u} Laugh when the air leaves her lungs.{u} She’s yours to mess up.{u} She cannot do anything.{u} She has no power.{u}


Look at her.{u} Breathe.
Lock the cuff to the side of the bed.{u} She’s mock-protesting, like she doesn’t understand why you’re doing this to her.{u} “What- why- why are you acting like that, Mistress?”{u} You know, little slut.{u} You asked for this.{u} You deserve this.{u} Shut her up, use more of your weight.{u} You still have another arm to go, and then the legs.{u} The arm is easy to catch, even if she flails.{u} She’s on her back, you’re on top of her.


Amélie: Please, Mistress!{u} Can you tell me what I’ve done?{u}


Does she want me to slap her?{u}


Cécile: You will see, toy.{u} Now, hush, and let me have my fun.{u} Let me have my way with what’s mine. 


There was a ring gag among the other toys.{u} Where was it again?{u} I didn’t have the emotional breadth to listen to her, to keep answering in my dominant voice.{u} I grabbed her by the hair, pushed it into a pillow.{u} I didn’t find the ring gag right away.{u} She had, somehow, put a dildo gag next to the other toys, even though it was too big for her and it always made her throw up in the end.


Breathe.


I grabbed the ring gag, and put it in between her teeth.{u} Teasing her that there was nothing she could say that would make me stop anyway.{u} (The safeword is to snap her fingers,{u} and I don’t tell her because she knows and that would take her out of the scene).{u} And then… back to the legs.{u} I can’t have her moving around when I have a knife.{u} She can’t resist the pain, the fear.{u} She’s too immersed in them.{u} If she suddenly moves, she’ll get hurt,{u} and the name won’t look right.
There. Only the blindfold, and you can start.
She won’t see anything.
You’ll have her all for yourself.


I didn’t use the knife right away, beyond a few teasing caresses, not with the edge but with the spine;{u} beyond my fear, beyond the urge to throw away the knife, I mostly did so because I knew that it was too soon.
I let myself take a breath. I allowed myself to close my eyes and to calm down.


When I opened them, I got off Amélie's back.{u} Standing by the bed, I took my time in watching her: blind, mute, and unable to move, she was wholly in my power.
She was so beautiful.{u}
Her body was laid bare, and she was softly panting through the ring gag.{u} The texture of her skin, her creases, the wrinkles -{u} the hair, standing so thin on her arms and legs, grown wilder near her armpits.


I slid my nails against her skin, and that gesture was between a scratch and a caress.{u} I walked around the bed, admiring her beauty, and marvelled at her trust.{u} I never understood how she could let me be so close:{u} didn’t it frighten her, to know that she had no means to fight if I were to harm her?


I paused.
Beneath my fear, I sensed another emotion beating.{u} A pulse, steady in the midst of the chaos, measured.{u}
I had finally found it.
I grinned and immersed myself in my lust for power.




For some time, I kept my terror in check.{u} I made sure I showed Amélie that her body was mine: I firmly grabbed her flesh to twist, to pull and to bite.{u} I forbade her from moving, and I laughed whenever she failed at her task.


# Sprite: sadistic, laughing
Leïla: What a poor toy you make, unable to follow a simple command.
# Sprite: sadistic, stern
Leïla: Do better, or I will throw you away, do you hear me?


Amélie could not talk through the gag, but only whine.


# Sprite: sadistic/disappointed
Leïla: You can’t even answer your Mistress when she asks you a simple question.
Leïla: How lower can you possibly sink than that?


I grinned when she cried, and I grinned when she moaned.{u} I stepped on her limbs, putting all of my weight, and I kept at it through her protests,{u} only stopping once she yelled so loudly that it was clear she could not stand the pain any longer.{u} And, during all that time, I kept mixing my degradation with some condescending praise -{u} “you’re not useless after all” and “I’m so proud of you, your cries are so pretty - oh, do it again!”.


Yes, for some time, I kept my terror in check{u} - but it came back when I felt that it was time to really use the knife.


I was all too aware of its weight, and it made me feel cold and afraid.
I had tarried as much as I could allow myself to.{u} Amélie no longer twitched when I slid the knife’s spine across her flesh, and her cries were no longer mixed with any moan.{u} Not pleased, but indignant.{u} At some point, she had emerged from her subspace and grown bored.
I’m sure that, had I not gagged her, she would have asked me what the hell I was waiting for.




I sat on top of Amélie once again.


# Sprite: Sadistic/Anxious. Can you make an effect that looks like she’s correcting herself, a sudden shake with my little pain slut or something?
Leïla: Well. I think you have waited long enough, my little angel - my little pain slut.


# Can you make her voice constantly shake with fear for the next few sentences?
Leïla: But now, you’ll need to sit very still.
Leïla: This will hurt so much.
Leïla: But you don’t want me to make a mistake. You don’t want ugly scars that will stay on your back forever.
Leïla: No. You want to be mine.
Leïla: And I’m going to mark you. To make it so everyone will see you and know that you’re already taken. 
Leïla: And, if you run away, they will know whom to bring you back to.
# Can you make that sentence slow?
Leïla: After this, you won’t ever be able to escape.




The knife came into contact with her back.
For a split second, it brought me back to my job - to all those incisions I made in the flesh of corpses to access their arteries.
I gulped, steadying my hand.


I was glad not to be holding a scalpel: the edge would have been too sharp and it would have cut too deep.
For all of Amélie’s complaints about knives’ edges being dull, I knew how easy it was to pierce the skin. You don’t really need anything sharp.
You only need to stop caring about your target’s integrity.{u} Quell the fear that you are hurting them, and that it is wrong{u} - stop seeing them as a living being, and start thinking that this is just a job.


We use scalpels because they’re precise and neat, but I know how fragile the human skin is.{u} If we didn’t care about appearance or accuracy, even a round kitchen knife would be enough to cut a throat.
But Amélie didn’t want a small cut.{u} She didn’t want anything elegant or unobtrusive, small wounds that I could suture and hide.{u} She wanted to flaunt them.{u} She wanted EVERYONE to see that her girlfriend was a freak who got off on carving her up with a knife.


Breathe. I’m panicking. I need to calm down. I need not to break.
Just do it.
Cut into her flesh.
Carve your name, just like she wants.


I had no idea how big my letters should be, and the thought made me pause.
But I had already pressed my knife against the skin, and Amélie was holding her breath{u} - she could feel the difference in pressure, in texture, and all the anticipation would be ruined if I were to, what?{u} Take it away, trace my name with a finger to have an estimate?


I made the knife slide as I lifted it, so that only the tip remained.{u} I had done so softly, careful not to yet cut - and yet, there stood a red line.{u} There was no blood, of course - only skin irritation - but, for a moment, my heart jumped.
Breathe.
I pushed the tip into her back;{u} the sudden pressure made her gasp. She was trembling inside her cuffs.


# dialogue ; Leïla’s sprite is angry/sadistic/stressed when she speaks. Effect to see that she speaks harshly.
Maybe there’s too much slack. She’ll arch her back. Try to run away. She’ll mess everything.
Leïla: Stay. Still.


Breathe.{u} You’re too tense.{u} Breaths are too shallow.{u} Your stomach hurts.{u} It hurts.{u} How long have I been gritting my teeth?{u} I can’t relax my jaw.{u} I need to get this under control.{u} Amélie reined herself in; she was nodding,{u} Get it under control, you’re sitting on top of her, she can’t arch or move *that much*. Put more weight.{u} and a single drop of blood pearled. Deep, red, domed, held by capillarity.{u} Could she feel it? Was she reacting out of pain, or out of surprise and fear?
What did it feel like, to be sliced with a knife?


# Panting sound effect. Clouds of air around Leïla’s face.
# Pause


I caressed the drop with the tip of my finger, pulled against it;{u} I tried to ignore its hue against my skin;{u} I moved forward, so that I could have Amélie taste her own blood.
She could not stop me.{u} Not with that ring locking her teeth in place.{u} Her tongue was warm and moist.
My skin crawled when she tried to lick my hand.


Leïla [Sadistic, stressed]: Do you like how you taste?


She nodded. Yes, yes, yes, she loved it. She wanted more.




What followed feels even more vague.
Trying to remember is like erring into a deep mist, so thick that it fills my lungs entirely.


I drew my name with my index, using Amélie’s blood as a source of ink.{u} I must have thought that this would guide me, ensure that the letters were evenly wide.{u} There was not nearly enough blood for the task and, periodically, I pushed against the wound so that more would flow.{u} I might have stabbed her again, in a different place - the lower back ? - when the source dried.
It took some time and Amélie jerked against me because she wanted me to just carve her already,{u} she couldn’t see that I needed time to make sure the name looked good,{u} all she knew was that she had been lying on that bed forever and her arms were numb from not being able to move and when I wasn’t pulling on her hair her head was resting on the pillow, she could see nothing,{u} did she breathe well?


I prevaricate. I’m stalling.
Please, forgive me.


Yes. I cut her with the knife.


One strike after the other.


The first was too shallow.{u} For a second or two, I thought I had only made a scratch, and then it bled, but the result was uneven.{u} There were gaps in the line.
I was more violent thereafter.{u} I did not redo that line, that central I, right away, but I moved to the first L.{u} The skin easily gave under the edge.{u} It gaped, it had parted.{u} Would it ever heal?{u} It must have been too much.{u} It did not heal, even today I can still see the scar.{u} It’s textured and wide.{u} It bulges.{u} I hate its sick red, I hate how ugly it is.{u} I hate it and it’s all my fault.
She never bled right away.{u} It always took some time for the blood to surface, leaving me anxious that I had made a mistake.{u} I wished Amélie weren’t gagged, I wish I could ask her if this was too much.{u} How did it feel?{u} Did she like it?{u} Was I making her happy?{u} Please, let me make you happy.{u} Please, Amélie, I need you to be happy.


But she would have hated it.{u} She always snapped at me when I stopped in the middle of a scene to check on her.{u} “I would have safeworded if there was a problem!”{u} “Please let me have this, jeez!”{u} So I didn’t take off her gag, and I prayed that I was doing things right.{u} At one point, she flailed and it skewed my line, and I yelled at her.{u} My voice must have been too loud.{u} She froze thereafter.{u} I think she flinched, and it took all I had not to apologise.
Why did she have a safeword?{u} She never used it.{u} Would it have been okay for me to have one?{u} To tell her that this was enough?{u} That I had to stop, even though she was the one who got hurt?{u} The one who had to suffer, the one I abused?


I kept cutting.{u} More wounds.{u} More lines.{u} More blood.{u} Some of the wounds were too deep and I had to stop to get the swab because I couldn’t see her skin well enough to finish my job.{u} Amélie yelled.{u} She was so afraid, she was in such pain - or she was pretending.{u} Was she pretending?{u} Was it all a game?{u} Was she having fun while I -


But my name is only made of lines.{u} Curves would have been hard to properly make with a knife.{u} Twelve strokes.{u} Counting the ones I messed up, I must have only made fifteen or sixteen cuts.{u} Two dots as well, on top of the I;{u} I should have stabbed her there when I first pressed the knife.
I’m sure it didn’t take too long to do all that.


I kept playing the role.
# Leïla looks heavily dissociative. Head towards the shoulder. Feels sick. Shadow over her face. Hair is a mess.
Leïla: There. You’re perfect.
Leïla: My sweet, submissive doll.{u} All for me to own, for the rest of your life.
Leïla: You can stop crying now.
Leïla: You know I don’t care if it hurts, right?
Leïla: I’m only doing this for my own pleasure.
Leïla: Because it’s fun to see you whimper, to see you flail.
Leïla: Hahaha…


Leïla: …M-maybe…


Breathe.
She told you what she wants.
You’re almost done.


Leïla: M-maybe I could - I should carve you a bit more.
Leïla: You have so much skin, after all
So much skin? Really? Everyone has sk-
Leïla: I could write all over you.
Leïla: You couldn’t do anything to stop me.


I lay upon her. She winced from the pressure of my body on top of her wounds.


Leïla: I could show the world what you- what you really are. Yes.
Leïla: Hahaha.


I grabbed her arm. I felt her muscles tense.
# Put an effect of weight on the word slut.
Leïla: S-some more cuts. You’ve been so brave. You can take more.
Leïla: In big, uppercase letters… first an S, then an A… L, O, P and E… I’ll show the world what you really are. A slut. Unable to control herself. A fucktoy who only thinks with her crotch and who lets anyone abuse her.
Leïla: T-they’d grab you by the arm,{u} try to use you like a fleshlight, and, and…
Leïla: They would only stop when they see my name on your back.
Leïla: They would know… that they need my permission in order to do that.
Leïla: What do you think, whore ?


There. You did it.
Breathe.
You’re okay.
You can be proud of yourself.


Amélie moaned, or maybe she cried, and there was so much drool on her pillow.{u} She was moving her head frantically.{u} It was hard to see them in this position, but… her eyes were full of fear.{u} She was so afraid.{u} Trembling so hard.


She’s looking at you. Smile. She’ll… she won’t like it if she sees how sick you are.
# Amélie’s sprite goes from dissociated to breathing to neutral to sadistic


Leïla: I can’t hear you under that stupid gag.


There. I can take it off… No, I can’t. I can’t. It’s not in character. Draw back your hand. Draw back your hand. It was just a - a bluff. Making her think I actually would ask her opinion even though -


Leïla: …What, you think I actually care?
Leïla: You should know your place by now.
Leïla: You’re just here to suffer.
# Sadistic, dissociated smile
Leïla: You’re not in control.
Leïla: Everything that happens, happens how I want.
Leïla: If it pleased me, I could even
Leïla: Kill.
# Pause
Leïla: You
# Pause 
Leïla: Now
# Pause
Leïla: And you wouldn’t be able to lift a finger.
Leïla: In fact…


Grab her hair. We’re almost done.
Pull it.
Expose the throat.
Now, make sure to press the knife.
Make sure she feels its.


Leïla: …I think it’s time to say goodbye.


She was screaming so loud.
She was so afraid that it made me want to throw up.


Leïla: I love you darling.
Leïla: Farewell~


Just do it.
Pull harder on the hair.
At the last moment, when it’s no longer in contact, twist the knife.
Put the spine back on her throat.
Slice.


From that position…
Amélie was so afraid. Her eyes… wide open… there were tears in them…
But she realised…
She realised the knife had… it was okay…
And I released her hair…
She relaxed her body and slumped into the bed.


# Amélie’s sprite : face obscured.
She kept crying.
I caressed her hair.
I was long gone by then.
Lost in the texture, the curls.
Looking in the distance.
Trying to steady my breath.
I cuddled her, whispering how precious she was.{u} How I would never do anything like that to her.{u} She was mine. {u} I loved her.{u} I loved her more than anything in the world and she was okay.{u} I unbuckled the cuff.{u} She let it lie on the bed, not making any effort to free herself, so…{u} I untied the rest of her limbs, and her gag in the end.


She couldn’t speak at first. She was overwhelmed with emotion.
I kept cuddling, hugging, kissing.
Trying my best not to break down.
I wasn’t done.
She still needed the aftercare.


# Sprite : face obscured for the eyes, gritting teeth.
It felt like an eternity but, eventually, she moved to hold me in her arms.
She pushed her head so deep into my shoulder. She was gripping me so tight.


# Sprite : smiling, crying, hearts.
Amélie: …Oh, God, that was amazing.
Amélie: You did so well. I really thought I was going to die - and, and when you were cutting me - hahaha - I could, I could feel it! Each slice; I tried to feel the shape of the letters but, wow, that’s so much harder than you think it would be.
Amélie: I guess we really don’t have many nerves there, uh.
Amélie: I could probably tell if you were cutting my palm but that’s a terrible idea.
Amélie: Probably going to try with, like, a pen.
Amélie: …It’s probably cheating if I’m trying myself.
Amélie: Hahahaha, oh, wow, I, I’ve never felt so alive!
Amélie: How does it look?


Breathe.
Leïla: We’ll look in the mirror when we go disinfect the wound, but… it’s legible.
Leïla: I didn’t… hurt you too much?
Amélie: Are you kidding? It was amazing! Wow, it felt so *good!* There’s that burn that takes a second to come. It’s so weird how it does that!
Amélie: Well, it did feel… I didn’t like how it felt when you cut several times in the same space.
Amélie: It’s just, weird, and itchy, and not as good.
Amélie: So maybe you could try doing it right on the first cut next time?
Amélie: Also, I really liked the teeth when you held it against my throat. Maybe we could angle them or use them more? Not when you’re cutting but when you’re teasing cause…
they have all that texture and the back… the back is so *boring* next to them!
Leïla: The spine.
Amélie: Yeah, I guess that’s how you call it. Huh. Thanks, babe.
Amélie: Oh, how much did I bleed?


Why don’t you just… look at the bed?
Breathe.


Leïla: …we’re definitely going to have to put the sheets in the laundry.
Leïla: I hope… I hope there’s no stain.
Amélie: Eeeeeh, should be fine.
Amélie: Oh, god, I’m still on cloud nine.
Amélie: It’s like I’m high.
Amélie: Hahahahaha
Amélie: Can you please… can you please take care of that? I’d like to lie down and bask in it for a while.
Leïla: Uh.
Leïla: …I need you to move to get the sheet then.
Amélie: Oh, yeah, right. Of course.
Amélie: Oh and we probably need to clean the wounds.
Amélie: Oh, god.
Amélie: Thank you so much, babe. Miss.
Amélie: That was, without a doubt, the best scene of my life.


She looked right at me.
There was such joy in her eyes.
I breathed a sigh of relief - I hadn’t exhaled in a while.
I was so afraid that she wouldn’t be okay.


Everything was fine.
She was fine.
It would all be okay.


# Sad smile
Leïla: Of course, love.
Leïla: I’m happy I could give this to you.
Leïla: I’m so glad you enjoyed this.
Leïla: Come on now, let’s disinfect your wounds and dress them up.
Amélie: But I want to see— them !






It was hard for me to sleep that night.
I lay next to Amélie for a while, eyes open in the dark.
At some point, I got up.
I took a shower.
I cried.






_____


Trying to step back.


…On that morning…












Another day
Essayer de sortir du cycle




Mushroom hunt


### Mushroom hunt


### Amélie’s surprise


[Leïla breaks and hurts Amélie. Chases her down. Tells her that’s what she always asks for : to be hunted, beaten, raped. Amélie is scared, doesn’t know how to react. Not what she expected.]


Leïla craque




Bad End




____


* Leïla apprend à dominer. Ca la surprend, mais ça lui plait. Elle aime les réactions de Amélie, elle aime son amour, elle aime préparer des scènes car c'est un moyen de montrer qu'elle comprend sa copine, qu'elle l'accepte mieux que personne.
* En même temps, elle a des limites. Je remets le passage sur le rapeplay à ce moment-là, et l'idée est que Amélie ne veut pas montrer sa déception mais que Leïla la sent. Amélie a peur d'être rejetée, laissée tomber, et elle tait un peu ses envies, revient en arrière, se renferme
* C'est frustrant pour Leïla qui a dit non à des scènes précises, pas au BDSM dans son ensemble, et elle a l'impression qu'on ne peut pas avoir de discussion avec Amélie sur ça.
* D'autres problèmes arrivent : Amélie trouve une play partner et rayonne de faire des choses qu'elle ne fait pas forcément avec Leïla, dit sans réfléchir qu'elle se sent vraiment comprise. Et ça fait mal car Leïla fait des efforts, veut faire plus. Distance. Promesses de mieux faire. Problèmes avec la play partner, elles arrêtent de se voir, Amélie retourne vers Leïla.
Scène charnière : peur de perdre, voir que ça rend heureuse, moment de bascule.
   * Du temps passe. Sorte de pic dépressif à un moment. Amélie qui est plus renfermée, voit moins de monde. Se plonge un peu plus dans le BDSM, s'y réfugie. Habitude à plus appeler Leïla Maîtresse. Leïla participe et voit que ça l'aide à aller mieux. Doutes sur si c'est sain. Mais ça a l'air d'aider ?
   * Amélie est défensive sur l'idée que le BDSM est malsain. Elle n'est pas une pauvre victime traumatisée incapable de faire ses choix, elle est adulte, elle veut du respect.
   * La dynamique se poursuit.


Scène du couteau. Flashback. Le faire pour Amélie après qu'elle en a longtemps parlé, qu'elle avait marre que les marques ne tiennent pas. Je sais pas exactement comment gérer cette scène, soit
* A) Leïla aime le BDSM avec Amélie, elle aime faire mal, donner des ordres, des insultes qui restent affectueuses, et Amélie demande une scène bien plus dure que d'habitude. Difficulté à garder le masque durant toute la scène. Ne pas réussir à s'abandonner car peur d'aller trop loin, de faire des marques trop profondes, des dommages irréparables. D'un côté elle passe toute la scène à dire à Amélie qu'elle n'en a rien à faire d'elle, de l'autre elle panique, elle panique et ne peut pas le montrer car ça casserait tout. Après la scène, câlin et, par peur que Amélie aille mal, qu'elle soit un monstre d'avoir fait ça, aftercare uniquement sur Amélie. N'arrive pas à dormir plus tard la nuit. Au matin, se concentre sur le chocolat, l'amour qui n'avait pas été aussi fort depuis un moment.
* B) Leïla se perd plus dans la scène et se déteste a posteriori car c'est un dom drop
Leïla arrivait à poser des limites, mais Amélie les érodait sans le vouloir consciemment, en étant plus amoureuse quand elles font des scènes, plus distantes quand on refuse quelque chose même si elle le cache. Au fur et à mesure, point de contact principal. Leïla voit que Amélie va mal et qu'elle aime vraiment être traitée comme ça, donc elle pousse plus loin, surtout quand elle ne veut pas la perdre.
(le problème du... la personne qui est désolée d'avoir fait quelque chose de mal et qui est tellement désolée qu'elle n'arrive pas à parler d'autre chose car elle s'en veut, ce qui est épuisant à vivre car on doit rassurer l'autre et que ça décourage de relancer la discussion)
(et aussi, comment est-ce qu'on explique à quelqu'un qu'on ne veut pas faire une scène quand elle dit "mais ça me fait plaisir, t'en fais pas", et qu'on voit que ça fait plaisir et qu'on veut faire plaisir)
Une autre scène que je veux écrire, c'est, genre. Impression de pas pouvoir parler de ça aux gens. De pas pouvoir parler de l'inconfort à Amélie car elle est trop prompte à dire désolée, que c'est de sa faute, à marcher sur des oeufs, car elle se défend en disant qu'elle aime ça, et de pas en pouvoir parler aux autres car c'est un sujet trop sensible de dire "je m'en veux d'avoir coupé ma copine avec un couteau" + sorte de jalousie/colère envers Amélie qui en parle très facilement avec des amies.
"Comment elle fait pour en parler comme si de rien n'était ? Elle capte qu'elle me fait passer pour une abuseuse là? Et pourquoi elle arrive à en parler aussi facilement alors que moi je dois faire plein d'efforts pour qu'elle me dise ce qu'elle veut vraiment"
Sans doute rajouter un côté "people pleaser" de Amélie, qui a trop tendance à certains moments à dire à Leïla que ça lui va ce qu'elles font alors qu'elle veut plus.
Onglet 2


[a]Suppression de "she came to wake earlier than I" au regard du temps de travail.
[b]Changement
[c]Bunker développé. Vie sûre, mais où on est coincé, sans espoir d'aller mieux, plus attaché à ce qui était que ce qui est.
[d]Changement
[e]Changement
[f]Changement
[g]Changement
[h]Changement
[i]Changement
[j]Changer l'idée globale car non musulmane. J'aime bien l'absence de communication sur ça, le "je vais pas fumer mais je veux tenter le rp" VS "ah non ne fume pas tu vas te niquer les poumons... attends mais ça sert à rien si tu fumes pas?"
[k]Idée globale et je demanderai à quelqu'un de vérifier pour pas dire de bêtises - là j'ai surtout peur que ça ne soit pas clair du tout.


Amira ne veut pas fumer, c'est haram, mais elle se dit qu'elle peut éventuellement allumer la cigarette et jouer à faire semblant pour le fantasme.
Léona ne comprend pas ce qu'Amira veut faire : elle s'imagine que si Amira dit ça, c'est pour vraiment fumer. Elle ne considère pas qu'elle est musulmane, que c'est interdit (et doit se dire que le BDSM aussi est interdit donc bon ça change quoi). Si elle avait compris, elle dirait à Amira que ça ne sert à rien si c'est pour de faux. C'est un autre moyen de montrer le manque de communication.
[l]Dans toute cette séquence tu peut insister un peu plus sur la joie de voir qqn lui faire confiance au point de lui abandonner son corp lorsque dom, c'est déjà un peu dit mais c'est un truc que et je ressent bcp je me dit que ça pourrait être plus présent.
La scène est déjà super tel quel donc c'est pas le plus important. C'est une idée qui pourrait ressortir dans une autre scène peut être
[m]je trouve que la "chute" émotionnelle de Cécile ici est un peu rapide, même si on comprend bien qu'elle est directement saoulée pcq c'est pas la première fois que ça arrive dans le récit, comme c'est la première fois que le lecteur voit ça je pense que on pourrait ajouter une étape de discussion et où negotiations qui aboutira au même point. 
Aussi les arguments de Cécile tourne uniquement autour du fait que Silvia n'aurais pas pu supporter plus mais elle pourrait aussi dire que c'est la quantité que elle a jugé suffisante et avec laquelle elle prenait du plaisir. (Est-ce que c'est volontaire que Cecile ai du mal à formuler ses besoins?)
[n]J'ai l'impression que c'est pas tant le bdsm le problème ici que leur communication. Donc j'aurais plus vu "it made me question if she ever considered my needs" a moins que ce soit volontaire que Cecile préfère voir le bdsm comme le vrais problème car incapable de remettre en question sa relation
[o]Amira veut éviter les situations susceptibles de créer des conflits et n'arrive pas à remettre en cause la relation, oui. Elle n'a pas le recul nécessaire sur le moment.
[p]To be continued: Silvia's guilt makes her distance herself and want to quit BDSM with Cécile because she sees she hurts her and is unsatisfied, but she won't talk about it. She feels like she's messing everything up and fears being broken up with... so she goes back into hiding. Rescinds intimacy.


Her idea is to... do it with someone else?


Naturally, this doesn't help Cécile. It makes everything worse.
[q]Pas fan
[r]Changement formulation pour montrer qu'Amélie doit être satisfaite pour pouvoir avoir des scènes soft
[s]Intense 🔥